Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.825

K-20 network—Oversight—Coordination of telecommunications planning.

(1) In overseeing the technical aspects of the K-20 network, the board is not intended to duplicate the statutory responsibilities of the student achievement council, the superintendent of public instruction, the board, the state librarian, or the governing boards of the institutions of higher education.

(2) The board may not interfere in any curriculum or legally offered programming offered over the network.

(3) The responsibility to review and approve standards and common specifications for the network remains the responsibility of the board.

(4) The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common schools remains the responsibility of the superintendent of public instruction. The board may recommend, but not require, revisions to the superintendent's telecommunications plans.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 106; 2012 c 229 s 588; 2004 c 275 s 62; 1999 c 285 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.